District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1005

Reimbursement of Commission members’ expenses; office space, supplies, and personnel.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-84, § 6, 32 DCR 7287
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 252, 62 DCR 1884

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3205.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 252 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 252 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).